Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.310

Possessing a stolen firearm.

(1) A person is guilty of possessing a stolen firearm if he or she possesses, carries, delivers, sells, or is in control of a stolen firearm.

(2) This section applies regardless of the stolen firearm's value.

(3) Each stolen firearm possessed under this section is a separate offense.

(4) The definition of "possessing stolen property" and the defense allowed against the prosecution for possessing stolen property under RCW 9A.56.140 shall apply to the crime of possessing a stolen firearm.

(5) As used in this section, "firearm" means any firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010.

(6) Possessing a stolen firearm is a class B felony.

[ 1995 c 129 s 13 (Initiative Measure No. 159).]

NOTES:

Findings and intent—Short title—Severability—Captions not law—1995 c 129: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.